District of Columbia statutes.
31-2231.04

False information and advertising generally.

No person shall make, publish, disseminate, circulate, or place before the public, or cause, directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public, in a newspaper, magazine, or other publication, or in a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, or poster, or over a radio or television station, or in any other way, an advertisement, announcement, or statement containing an assertion, representation, or statement with respect to the business of insurance or with respect to an insurer in the conduct of its insurance business which is untrue, deceptive, or misleading.

History

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 104, 48 DCR 1225